Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-120.03
Young worker, defined.

Young worker means (1) for an initial credential under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, except for a body art license, an applicant who is between the ages of seventeen and twenty-five years or (2) for an initial credential issued under any other provision of the Uniform Credentialing Act, including a body art license, an applicant who is between the ages of eighteen and twenty-five years.

Laws 2019, LB112, § 6.

Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, see section 38-1001.